de: Unterstütztes Format: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Sonstiges
cs: Podporovaný formát: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Jiné
sl-SI: Podprt format: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Drugo
pt-BR: Formato com suporte: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Outro
es: Formato compatible: 10x15 cm; 11x14 pulgadas; 12x16 pulgadas; 13x18 cm; 15x20 cm; 16x20 pulgadas; 18x24 cm; 20x24 pulgadas; 20x25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5x7 pulgadas; 50 x 60 cm; 8x10 pulgadas; 8x12 pulgadas; 9 x 13 cm; Otros
it: Formato supportato: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Altro
ru: Поддерживаемые форматы: 10 х 15 см; 11 х 14 дюймов; 12 х 16 дюймов; 13 х 18 см; 15 х 20 см; 16 х 20 дюймов; 18 х 24 см; 20 х 24 дюйма; 20 х 25 см; 20 х 30 см; 24 х 30 см; 30 х 40 см; 40 х 50 см; 5 х 7 дюймов; 50 х 60 см; 8 х 10 дюймов; 8 х 12 дюймов; 9 х 13 см; Другой
da: Format understøttet: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 tommer; 12 x 16 tommer; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 tommer; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 tommer; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 tommer; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 tommer; 8 x 12 tommer; 9 x 13 cm; Andet
lt-LT: Palaikomas formatas: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Kita
hr-HR: Podržani format: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Ostalo
zh-CN: 支持的格式: 10x15 厘米; 11x14 英寸; 12x16 英寸; 13x18 厘米; 15x20 厘米; 16x20 英寸; 18x24 厘米; 20x24 英寸; 20x25 厘米; 20x30 厘米; 24x30 厘米; 30x40 厘米; 40x50 厘米; 5x7 英寸; 50x60 厘米; 8x10 英寸; 8x12 英寸; 9x13 厘米; 其他
th: รูปแบบที่รองรับ: 10 x 15 ซม.; 11 x 14 นิ้ว; 12 x 16 นิ้ว; 13 x 18 ซม.; 15 x 20 ซม.; 16 x 20 นิ้ว; 18 x 24 ซม.; 20 x 24 นิ้ว; 20 x 25 ซม.; 20 x 30 ซม.; 24 x 30 ซม.; 30 x 40 ซม.; 40 x 50 ซม.; 5 x 7 นิ้ว; 50 x 60 ซม.; 8 x 10 นิ้ว; 8 x 12 นิ้ว; 9 x 13 ซม.; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 支援的格式: 10 x 15 公分; 11 x 14 英寸; 12 x 16 英寸; 13 x 18 公分; 15 x 20 公分; 16 x 20 英寸; 18 x 24 公分; 20 x 24 英寸; 20 x 25 公分; 20 x 30 公分; 24 x 30 公分; 30 x 40 公分; 40 x 50 公分; 5 x 7 英寸; 50 x 60 公分; 8 x 10 英寸; 8 x 12 英寸; 9 x 13 公分; 其他
sv: Kompatibla format: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 tum; 12 x 16 tum; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 tum; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 tum; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 tum; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 tum; 8 x 12 tum; 9 x 13 cm; Annat
hu: Támogatott formátum: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 hüvelyk; 12 x 16 hüvelyk; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 hüvelyk; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 hüvelyk; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 hüvelyk; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 hüvelyk; 8 x 12 hüvelyk; 9 x 13 cm; Egyéb
el: Υποστηριζόμενη μορφή: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Άλλο
sk-SK: Podporovaný formát: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 palcov; 12 x 16 palcov; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 palcov; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 palcov; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 palcov; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 palcov; 8 x 12 palcov; 9 x 13 cm; Iné
fr: Format pris en charge: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 po; 12 x 16 po; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 po; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 po; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 po; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 po; 8 x 12 po; 9 x 13 cm; Autre
nl: Ondersteund formaat: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 inch; 12 x 16 inch; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 inch; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 inch; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 inch; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 inch; 8 x 12 inch; 9 x 13 cm; Andere
tr: Desteklenen Format: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 inç; 12 x 16 inç; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 inç; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 inç; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 inç; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 inç; 8 x 12 inç; 9 x 13 cm; Diğer
pt-PT: Formato suportado: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 pol.; 12 x 16 pol.; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 pol.; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 pol.; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 pol.; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 pol.; 8 x 12 pol.; 9 x 13 cm; Outro
fi: Tuettu formaatti: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 tuumaa; 12 x 16 tuumaa; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 tuumaa; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 tuumaa; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 tuumaa; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 tuumaa; 8 x 12 tuumaa; 9 x 13 cm; Muu
ro-RO: Format acceptat: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 11 x 14 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Altele
nb: Format støttes: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 tomme; 12 x 16 tomme; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 tomme; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 tomme; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 tomme; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 tomme; 8 x 12 tomme; 9 x 13 cm; Annen
pl: Obsługiwany format: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Pozostałe
bg-BG: Поддържан формат: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 инча; 12 x 16 инча; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 инча; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 инча; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 инча; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 инча; 8 x 12 инча; 9 x 13 cm; Други
ko: 지원되는 형식: 10 x 15cm; 11 x 14인치; 12 x 16인치; 13 x 18cm; 15 x 20cm; 16 x 20인치; 18 x 24cm; 20 x 24인치; 20 x 25cm; 20 x 30cm; 24 x 30cm; 30 x 40cm; 40 x 50cm; 5 x 7인치; 50 x 60cm; 8 x 10인치; 8 x 12인치; 9 x 13cm; 기타
ja: 対応フォーマット: 10x15センチ; 11x14インチ; 12x16インチ; 13x18センチ; 15x20センチ; 16x20インチ; 18x24センチ; 20x24インチ; 20x25センチ; 20x30センチ; 24x30センチ; 30x40センチ; 40x50センチ; 5x7インチ; 50x60センチ; 8x10インチ; 8x12インチ; 9x13センチ; その他
en: Format supported: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Other
vi: Định dạng được hỗ trợ: 10 x 15 cm; 11 x 14 in; 12 x 16 in; 13 x 18 cm; 15 x 20 cm; 16 x 20 in; 18 x 24 cm; 20 x 24 in; 20 x 25 cm; 20 x 30 cm; 24 x 30 cm; 30 x 40 cm; 40 x 50 cm; 5 x 7 in; 50 x 60 cm; 8 x 10 in; 8 x 12 in; 9 x 13 cm; Khác